Washington statutes.
RCW 8.04.099

Acquisition when several ownerships—Selection of single jury.

Thereafter, if requested by the state, a single jury shall be selected to hear and determine in separate trials, the amount of compensation and damages, if any, that shall be paid for the different tracts, parcels, property, or property rights, as set forth in the petition.

[ 1955 c 156 s 3. Formerly RCW 8.04.210.]

NOTES:

Juries—Civil actions, selection, impaneling, and swearing of: Chapters 2.36, 4.44 RCW.